Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.105

Inform patient of qualifications of midwife—Form.

The secretary, with the advice of the midwifery advisory committee, shall develop a form to be used by a midwife to inform the patient of the qualifications of a licensed midwife.

[ 1991 c 3 s 111; 1981 c 53 s 12.]